District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.13

Appropriations.

There are hereby authorized to be appropriated, out of any money in the Treasury to the credit of the District of Columbia not otherwise appropriated, such sums as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 704, ch. 862, § 13
Oct. 4, 1961, 75 Stat. 819, Pub. L. 87-389, § 1(21, 22, 23)
Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 205(3) (m), (n)
Dec. 23, 1971, 85 Stat. 793, Pub. L. 92-220, § 1(23)-(25), (27)
Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 471, Pub. L. 93-376, title VII, § 706(a)

History

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.14.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-1317.
1973 Ed., § 1-1113.

Prior Codifications